el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Ποδόσφαιρο > Βοηθήματα προπόνησης ποδοσφαίρου: Στύλοι ευκινησίας ποδοσφαίρου; Εκτοξευτές μπάλας ποδοσφαίρου; Στρώματα προπόνησης κινητικότητας ποδιών ποδοσφαίρου; Τόξα πάσας ποδοσφαίρου; Συσκευές αναπήδησης για ποδόσφαιρο; Σακίδια προπόνησης ποδοσφαίρου; Ομοιώματα προπόνησης ποδοσφαίρου
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Futebol > Auxiliares de treino para futebol: Bastões de agilidade para futebol; Lançadores para bolas de futebol; Tapetes de treino de pés de futebol; Arcos para passes de futebol; Rebotes para futebol; Mochilas de treino para futebol; Manequins de treino para futebol
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Fútbol > Ayudas para el entrenamiento de fútbol: Postes de agilidad de fútbol; Lanzadores de balones de fútbol; Alfombrillas de entrenamiento de juego de pies para fútbol; Arcos de pases de fútbol; Rebotadores de fútbol; Mochilas de entrenamiento de fútbol; Maniquíes de entrenamiento de fútbol
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Fotboll > Träningshjälpmedel för fotboll: Fotbollssnabbhetsövningspinnar; Fotbollslanserare; Träningsmattor för fotarbete i fotboll; Fotbollspasseringsbågar; Fotbollsreturnerare; Träningsryggsäckar för fotboll; Fotbollsträningsdockor
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 축구 > 축구 훈련 장비: 축구 어질리티폴; 축구 슈팅 기계; 축구 풋워크 훈련 매트; 축구 패싱 아치; 축구 리바운더; 축구 트레이닝 배낭; 축구 트레이닝 모형
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Futebol > Acessórios de treinamento de futebol: Bastões de agilidade de futebol; Lançadores de bolas de futebol; Tapetes de treinamento de jogo de pernas de futebol; Arcos de passe de futebol; Rebotes para futebol; Mochilas de treino de futebol; Manequins de treinamento de futebol
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Piłka nożna > Pomoce treningowe do piłki nożnej: Piłkarskie tyczki do treningu zwinnościowego; Wyrzutnie piłek nożnych; Maty do treningu pracy nóg w piłce nożnej; Przeszkody piłkarskie trening podań; Odbijacze do piłki nożnej; Plecaki treningowe do piłki nożnej; Manekiny treningowe do piłki nożnej
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Fodbold > Hjælpemidler til fodboldtræning: Fodbold agility-stave; Fodboldskydere; Træningsmåtter til fodarbejde i fodbold; Fodboldkegler; Fodboldbander; Fodboldtræningsrygsække; Fodboldtræningsmannequiner
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Fotbal > Articole pentru antrenament fotbal: Stâlpi agilitate pentru fotbal; Lansatoare de mingi de fotbal; Saltele de antrenament tehnic pentru fotbal; Arcuri pentru pase fotbal; Plăci ricoșeu pentru fotbal; Rucsacuri pentru antrenamente de fotbal; Manechine de antrenament pentru fotbal
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > ฟุตบอล > อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกซ้อมฟุตบอล: เสาฝึกความคล่องแคล่ว; เครื่องยิงลูกฟุตบอล; เสื่อฝึกฟุตเวิร์กฟุตบอล; โค้งสำหรับฝึกผ่านบอล; กระดานเด้งลูกฟุตบอล; เป้สะพายหลังสำหรับฝึกซ้อมฟุตบอล; หุ่นฝึกซ้อมฟุตบอล
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Nogomet > Pripomočki za vadbo nogometa: Nogometne agility palice; Izstreljevalci nogometnih žog; Vadbene podloge za nogometni trening nožnih tehnik; Nogometni podajalni prehodi; Naprave za odbijanje žoge za nogomet; Nahrbtniki za vadbo nogometa; Lutke za vadbo nogometa
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Nogomet > Pomagala za trening nogometa: Nogometni slalom štapovi; Naprave za izbacivanje nogometnih lopti; Prostirke za vježbanje rada nogu za nogomet; Lukovi za trening za nogomet; Odbijajuće mreže za nogomet; Ruksaci za nogometni trening; Nogometne lutke za trening
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Soccer > Soccer Training Aids: Soccer Agility Poles; Soccer Ball Launchers; Soccer Footwork Training Mats; Soccer Passing Arcs; Soccer Rebounders; Soccer Training Backpacks; Soccer Training Mannequins
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Football > Aides à l’entraînement au football: Bâtons d’agilité de football; Lanceurs de ballons de football; Tapis d’entraînement au jeu de jambes de football; Arcs de passes de football; Filets de rebond de football; Sacs à dos d’entraînement au football; Mannequins d’entraînement au football
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Futbol > Futbol Eğitim Araçları: Futbol Çeviklik Direkleri; Futbol Topu Atıcıları; Futbol ayak hareketleri antrenman minderleri; Futbol Pas Yayları; Futbol Ribaundçuları; Futbol Antrenmanı Sırt Çantaları; Futbol Antrenman Mankenleri
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Kopaná > Tréninkové pomůcky na fotbal: Agility tyče pro fotbal; Míčové trenažéry pro trénink fotbalu; Fotbalové tréninkové podložky pro práci nohou; Překážkové oblouky pro trénink přesnosti přihrávek; Odrážecí trenažéry na trénink fotbalu; Tréninkové batohy na fotbal; Tréninkové figuríny pro fotbal
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 足球 > 足球訓練輔助器材: 足球敏捷訓練桿; 足球發射器; 足球腳法訓練墊; 足球練習拱門; 足球練習網; 足球訓練背包; 足球訓練用假人
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng đá > Dụng cụ hỗ trợ luyện tập bóng đá: Cột tập luyện độ nhanh chơi bóng đá; Máy phát bóng tập luyện bóng đá; Thảm tập chạy bước bóng đá; Khung vòng cung tập chuyền bóng đá; Lưới bật lại tập luyện bóng đá; Ba lô đựng đồ luyện tập bóng đá; Hình nộm tập luyện bóng đá
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Jalkapallo > Jalkapallon harjoitteluvälineet: Jalkapallon ketteryyssauvat; Jalkapallon laukaisulaitteet; Jalkapallon koordinaatiomatot; Jalkapallon syöttökaaret; Jalkapallon palauttimet; Jalkapallon harjoittelureput; Jalkapallon harjoittelumannekiinit
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Футбол > Помощни средства за тренировка по футбол: Стойки за упражняване на ловкост за футбол; Машини за изстрелване на футболни топки; Постелки за тренировки с крака; Тренировъчни арки за упражняване на подаване за футбол; Мрежи за рикошет за футбол; Раници за тренировки по футбол; Тренировъчни манекени за футбол
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Calcio > Ausili per l'allenamento del calcio: Pali per agilità nel calcio; Lanciatori di palloni da calcio; Tappetini per allenamento del gioco di gambe per calcio; Archi di passaggio di calcio; Reti da rimbalzo per calcio; Zaini da allenamento per il calcio; Manichini da allenamento per il calcio
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Voetbal > Trainingshulpmiddelen voor voetbal: Behendigheidspalen voor voetbal; Launchers voor voetbal; Voetwerktrainingsmatten voor voetbal; Passeerbogen voor voetbal; Rebounders voor voetbal; Trainingsrugzakken voor voetbal; Trainingspoppen voor voetbal
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Futball > Futball edzési segédeszközök: Futball ügyességi rudak; Futball labdaindítók; Futball lábmunka-edzőmatracok; Futball-passzívek; Futball-visszapattanók; Futball-edzőhátizsákok; Futball-edzőmanökenek
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Футбол > Тренировочный инвентарь для футбола: Шесты для дриблинга; Пушки для подачи футбольных мячей; Тренировочные футбольные коврики; Арки для отработки пасов; Футбольные тренажеры-стенки; Рюкзаки для футбольных тренировок; Тренировочные манекены для футбола
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Fußball > Fußball-Trainingshilfen: Fußball-Agility-Stangen; Ballschussmaschinen; Fußball-Fußarbeit-Trainingsmatten; Fußball-Trainingsbögen; Fußball-Rebounder; Fußball-Trainingsrucksäcke; Fußball-Trainingsdummies
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Futbal > Futbalové tréningové pomôcky: Prekážkové tyče na futbal; Odpaľovače futbalových lôpt; Trénovacie podložky na futbalovú techniku; Tréningové oblúky na futbal; Futbalové odrazové steny; Futbalové tréningové batohy; Futbalové tréningové figuríny
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 足球用品 > 足球训练辅助用品: 足球敏捷杆; 足球发球器; 足球步法训练垫; 足球训练拱门; 足球反弹器; 足球训练背包; 足球训练人体模型
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Fotball > Treningsutstyr for fotball: Agility-stenger for fotball; Fotballballutkastere; Treningsmatter for fotarbeid i fotball; Pasningsbuer for fotball; Reboundere for fotball; Ryggsekker for fotballtrening; Dukker for fotballtrening
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Futbolas > Futbolo treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės: Futbolo vikrumo treniruočių lazdos; Futbolo kamuolių patrankos; Futbolo kojų darbo lavinimo kilimėliai; Futbolo perdavimo treniruočių lankai; Futbolo atmušikliai; Futbolo treniruočių kuprinės; Futbolo treniruočių manekenai
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > サッカー > サッカー練習器具: サッカー用アジリティポール; サッカー用ボールランチャー; サッカー用フットワークトレーニングマット; サッカー用パスアーク; サッカー用リバウンダー; サッカー用トレーニングバックパック; サッカー練習用マネキン